hr-HR: Vrsta hibridnog sustava: Puni hibrid (HEV); Blagi hibrid (MHEV); Plug-in hibrid (PHEV); Električno vozilo s produljenim dosegom (EREV); Ostalo
cs: Typ hybridního systému: Plně hybridní (HEV); Mild-hybridní (MHEV); Plug-in hybrid (PHEV); Elektrický s prodlouženým dojezdem (EREV); Ostatní
ko: 하이브리드 시스템 유형: 풀 하이브리드(HEV); 마일드 하이브리드(MHEV); 플러그인 하이브리드(PHEV); 주행거리 연장형 전기차(EREV); 기타
el: Τύπος υβριδικού συστήματος: Πλήρως υβριδικό (HEV); Ήπια υβριδικό (MHEV); Υβριδικό plug-in (PHEV); Ηλεκτρικό εκτεταμένης αυτονομίας (EREV); Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип хибридна система: Пълен хибрид (HEV); Мек хибрид (MHEV); Plug-in хибрид (PHEV); Електромобил с удължен пробег (EREV); Други
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema híbrido: Híbrido completo (HEV); Híbrido leve (MHEV); Híbrido plug-in (PHEV); Elétrico de autonomia estendida (EREV); Outro
ru: Тип гибридной системы: Полный гибрид (HEV); Мягкий гибрид (MHEV); Подключаемый гибрид (PHEV); Электромобиль с увеличенным запасом хода (EREV); Другое
it: Tipo di sistema ibrido: Full hybrid (HEV); Mild hybrid (MHEV); Plug-in hybrid (PHEV); Elettrico ad autonomia estesa (EREV); Altro
tr: Hibrit sistem türü: Tam hibrit (HEV); Hafif hibrit (MHEV); Şarj edilebilir hibrit (PHEV); Menzili uzatılmış elektrikli (EREV); Diğer
da: Type af hybridsystem: Fuldhybrid (HEV); Mildhybrid (MHEV); Plug-in-hybrid (PHEV); Elbil med rækkeviddeforlænger (EREV); Andet
th: ระบบไฮบริดชนิด: ฟูลไฮบริด (HEV); ไมลด์ไฮบริด (MHEV); ปลั๊กอินไฮบริด (PHEV); ไฟฟ้าแบบขยายระยะทาง (EREV); อื่นๆ
hu: Hibrid rendszer típusa: Teljes hibrid (HEV); Lágy hibrid (MHEV); Plug-in hibrid (PHEV); Növelt hatótávú elektromos (EREV); Egyéb
de: Typ des Hybridsystems: Vollhybrid (HEV); Mildhybrid (MHEV); Plug-in-Hybrid (PHEV); Elektro mit Range Extender (EREV); Sonstiges
zh-CN: 混合系统类型: 全混合动力 (HEV); 轻度混合动力 (MHEV); 插电式混合动力 (PHEV); 增程式电动 (EREV); 其他
ja: ハイブリッドシステムタイプ: フルハイブリッド (HEV); マイルドハイブリッド (MHEV); プラグインハイブリッド (PHEV); レンジエクステンダー EV (EREV); その他
pl: Typ systemu hybrydowego: Pełna hybryda (HEV); Miękka hybryda (MHEV); Hybryda plug-in (PHEV); Elektryczny o zwiększonym zasięgu (EREV); Inne
sk-SK: Typ hybridného systému: Plne hybridný (HEV); Mild hybrid (MHEV); Plug-in hybrid (PHEV); Elektrický s predĺženým dojazdom (EREV); Iné
nl: Hybride systeem type: Volledig hybride (HEV); Mild hybride (MHEV); Plug-in hybride (PHEV); Elektrisch met range extender (EREV); Overig
fi: Hybridijärjestelmän tyyppi: Täyshybridi (HEV); Kevythybridi (MHEV); Lataushybridi (PHEV); Sähköauto polttomoottorilla (EREV); Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de sistem hibrid: Hibrid complet (HEV); Mild hybrid (MHEV); Hibrid plug-in (PHEV); Electric cu autonomie extinsă (EREV); Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema híbrido: Híbrido completo (HEV); Híbrido ligeiro (MHEV); Híbrido plug-in (PHEV); Elétrico de autonomia alargada (EREV); Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta hibridnega sistema: Popolni hibrid (HEV); Blagi hibrid (MHEV); Priključni hibrid (PHEV); Električno vozilo s podaljšanim dosegom (EREV); Drugo
sv: Hybridsystemtyp: Fullhybrid (HEV); Mildhybrid (MHEV); Laddhybrid (PHEV); Elbil med räckviddsförlängare (EREV); Övrigt
fr: Type de système hybride: Véhicule hybride complet (HEV); Hybridation légère (MHEV); Véhicule hybride rechargeable (PHEV); Véhicule électrique à prolongateur d’autonomie (EREV); Autre
lt-LT: Hibridinės sistemos tipas: Visiškas hibridas (HEV); Švelnusis hibridas (MHEV); Įkraunamas hibridas (PHEV); Prailginto nuotolio elektrinis (EREV); Kita
vi: Loại hệ thống hybrid: Hybrid toàn phần (HEV); Hybrid nhẹ (MHEV); Hybrid sạc điện (PHEV); Xe điện tăng quãng đường (EREV); Khác
en: Hybrid system type: Full hybrid (HEV); Mild hybrid (MHEV); Plug-in hybrid (PHEV); Range-extended electric (EREV); Other
zh-TW: 混合動力系統類型: 完全混合動力 (HEV); 輕油電混合動力 (MHEV); 插電式混合動力 (PHEV); 增程式電動 (EREV); 其他
es: Tipo de sistema híbrido: Híbrido completo (HEV); Híbrido suave (MHEV); Híbrido enchufable (PHEV); Eléctrico de autonomía extendida (EREV); Otro
nb: Hybrid systemtype: Fullhybrid (HEV); Mildhybrid (MHEV); Ladbar hybrid (PHEV); Elektrisk med rekkeviddeforlenger (EREV); Annet